Hawaii statutes.
§1-2 Certain laws not obligatory
until published. No written law, unless otherwise specifically provided by
legislative enactment, except general or special appropriation acts, loan fund
acts, pension acts, and franchise acts, shall be obligatory without first being
printed and made public. General or special appropriation acts, loan fund
acts, pension acts, and franchise acts, whether affecting state funds or the
funds of county or other municipal subdivisions or commissions, shall become
operative according to their respective terms. [CC 1859, §1; RL 1925, §3; RL
1935, §3; am L 1935, c 10, §2; RL 1945, §3; RL 1955, §1-3; HRS §1-2]

Case Notes

Prior to amendment spelling out that legislature may provide
a different effective date, statute was so interpreted. 29 H. 250, 255. See
37 H. 260.

Under article III, section 16, of the Constitution, a law may
become applicable from the time the governor approves it. 59 H. 430, 583 P.2d
955.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next